Missouri, session 2026, SB1038.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 285.530, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 285.530,
to read as follows:
285.530. 1. No business entity or employer shall
knowingly employ, hire for employment, or continue to employ
an unauthorized alien to perform work within the state of
Missouri.
2. As a condition for the award of any contract or
grant in excess of five thousand dollars by the state or by
any political subdivision of the state to a business entity,
or for any business entity receiving a state-administered or
subsidized tax credit, tax abatement, or loan from the
state, the business entity shall, by sworn affidavit and
provision of documentation, affirm its enrollment and
participation in a federal work authorization program with
respect to the employees working in connection with the
contracted services. Every such business entity shall also
sign an affidavit affirming that it does not knowingly
employ any person who is an unauthorized alien in connection
with the contracted services. Any entity contracting with
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1038 2
the state or any political subdivision of the state shall
only be required to provide the affidavits required in this
subsection to the state and any political subdivision of the
state with which it contracts, on an annual basis. During
or immediately after an emergency, the requirements of this
subsection that a business entity enroll and participate in
a federal work authorization program shall be suspended for
fifteen working days. As used in this subsection,
"emergency" includes the following natural and manmade
disasters: major snow and ice storms, floods, tornadoes,
severe weather, earthquakes, hazardous material incidents,
nuclear power plant accidents, other radiological hazards,
and major mechanical failures of a public utility facility.
3. All [public] employers shall enroll and actively
participate in a federal work authorization program.
Failure of any employer to enroll and actively participate
in a federal work authorization program shall result in the
following penalties:
(1) For a first offense, the attorney general shall
direct the applicable municipal or county governing body to
suspend any applicable license, permit, or exemptions of any
such employer for thirty days and the employer shall be
fined two thousand dollars for each unauthorized alien
performing work for the employer;
(2) For a second offense, the attorney general shall
direct the applicable municipal or county governing body to
suspend any applicable license, permit, or exemptions of any
such employer for ninety days and the employer shall be
fined two thousand dollars for each unauthorized alien
performing work for the employer;
(3) For a third offense, the attorney general shall
direct the applicable municipal or county governing body to

SB 1038 3
suspend any applicable license, permit, or exemptions of any
such employer for one year.
4. An employer [may enroll and participate in a
federal work authorization program and] shall verify the
employment eligibility of every employee in the employer's
hire whose employment commences after the employer enrolls
in a federal work authorization program. The employer shall
retain a copy of the dated verification report received from
the federal government. Any business entity that
participates in such program shall have an affirmative
defense that such business entity has not violated
subsection 1 of this section.
5. A general contractor or subcontractor of any tier
shall not be liable under sections 285.525 to 285.550 when
such general contractor or subcontractor contracts with its
direct subcontractor who violates subsection 1 of this
section, if the contract binding the contractor and
subcontractor affirmatively states that the direct
subcontractor is not knowingly in violation of subsection 1
of this section and shall not henceforth be in such
violation and the contractor or subcontractor receives a
sworn affidavit under the penalty of perjury attesting to
the fact that the direct subcontractor's employees are
lawfully present in the United States.
✓